test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AS_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dándas - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AS_STEM_2

     dándas+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándiija
     dándas+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándiijang
     dándas+V+DIRECT+PAST: dándiijan
     dándas+V+NON_FACTIVE: dándiijang
     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándiijang
     dándas+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándiijanggang
     dándas+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dándiijangang
     dándas+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándiijiinii
     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándiijaangaa
     dándas+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándiijaangaan
     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asa'áa
     dándas+V+NEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asa'áang
     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asaasdláa
     dándas+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asaasdláang
     dándas+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dándiij'ahlanggang
     dándas+V+CERTAIN+PAST: dándiij'ahlanggan
     dándas+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dándiij'ahlanggiinii
     dándas+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dándiij'ahlans
     dándas+V+REFLEXIVE: dándiij'ahl
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándiijang'waa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándiijang'waang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dándiijang'waa.ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándiijang'anggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dándiijang'angang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asaa'áng
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asaa'ánggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándiijang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándiijang'ang'waa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándiijang'ang'waang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dándiijang'ang'waa.ang
